Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1

General Provisions [Repealed in certain counties]

16-16-101. Establishment.

A court is established in each county for the dispatch of probate and other business entrusted to it, to be called the county court.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 127 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 1); Shan., § 221; Code 1932, § 161; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-701; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 245, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Election of county court judge, Tenn. Const. art. VI, § 4.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

State system of personnel administration, § 8-30-101 et seq.

Power of general assembly to create courts, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 1.

Term of office of county judges, § 5-6-102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Comparative Legislation. County courts:

Ark. Code § 16-15-101 et seq.

Ky. Const. § 140.

Miss. Code Ann. § 9-9-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 49.010 et seq.

Va. Code § 16.1-69.5.

Cited: Hollifield v. McMahan, 438 F. Supp. 589, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11860 (E.D. Tenn. 1976).

16-16-102. Special laws continued.

All the existing laws defining the local limits of the jurisdiction of the county courts, and fixing the times and places for holding the county courts, are continued in full force and effect, unless inconsistent with some positive provision of this code.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 128; Shan., § 222; Code 1932, § 162; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-702; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

16-16-103. Attendance at court.

The judge shall attend at the courthouse of the county in which the judge serves on the first Monday of every month; and shall, on first Mondays and subsequent days as may be necessary, attend to all matters and adjudicate and determine all questions and do all other acts and things required.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1875, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., § 6006; mod. Code 1932, § 10204; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-705; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Election, qualifications, and term of county court judges, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 4.

16-16-104. Terms of court.

The county court to be held by the county judge shall have its regular sessions on the first Monday of each month; and the court shall sit from day to day, so long as the business of the court may require.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4198 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 253, § 5); Shan., § 6023; Code 1932, § 10222; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-706; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev 689.

Cited: Johnson v. Brice, 112 Tenn. 59, 83 S.W. 791, 1903 Tenn. LEXIS 90 (1904); Ragland v. Davidson County Board of Education, 203 Tenn. 317, 312 S.W.2d 855, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 306 (1958).

16-16-105. Court always open.

The county court to be held by the county judge shall be deemed always open for the transaction of any business and the exercise of any jurisdiction conferred upon the county judge or upon the court held by the county judge.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1911, ch. 3, § 1; Shan., § 6006a1; mod. Code 1932, § 10205; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-707; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461.

Cited: Department of Highways & Public Works v. Gamble, 18 Tenn. App. 95, 73 S.W.2d 175, 1934 Tenn. App. LEXIS 16 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1934); Ragland v. Davidson County Board of Education, 203 Tenn. 317, 312 S.W.2d 855, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 306 (1958).

Collateral References. 21 C.J.S. Courts § 148.

16-16-106. Practice of law by judge.

The county judge is not precluded from practicing in the supreme, chancery, circuit, and criminal courts of this state, but shall not act as counsel in any case going up from the judge's court.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4200 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 253, § 12); Shan., § 6026; Code 1932, § 10224; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-708; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 8.

Law Reviews.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

Cited: State ex rel. Brooks v. Eblen, 185 Tenn. 566, 206 S.W.2d 793, 1947 Tenn. LEXIS 415 (1947).

16-16-107. Original jurisdiction.

The county court has original jurisdiction in the following cases:

The probate of wills;

The granting of letters testamentary and of administration, and the repeal and revocation of letters testamentary and of administration;

All controversies in relation to the right of executorship or of administration;

The settlement of accounts of executors and administrators;

The partition and distribution of the estates of decedents; and for these purposes, the power to sell the real and personal property belonging to the estates, if necessary to make the partition and distribution, or if manifestly for the interest of the parties;

To sell real estate for the payment of debts of a decedent as provided in former §§ 30-602 and 30-603;

The appointment and removal of guardians for minors and conservators for persons adjudicated incompetent, and all controversies as to the right of guardianship and conservatorship, and the settlement of guardian and conservator accounts;

The partition, sale or division of land;

The changing of names and the legitimation of children;

The issuance of inquisitions of unsoundness of mind; and

The binding out of apprentices, and all controversies between master and apprentice.

In counties having a county judge, the county judge shall have the powers enumerated in subdivision (a)(1).

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, §§ 4201, 4202 (deriv. Acts 1797, ch. 41; 1805, ch. 2, § 1; 1815, ch. 115; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 2; 1849-1850, ch. 27, § 1; 1849-1850, ch. 77, § 1; 1849-1850, ch. 185, § 1; 1851-1852, ch. 338, §§ 1, 2; 1853-1854, ch. 53, § 1); Acts 1873, ch. 64, § 1; Shan., §§ 6027, 6029; Code 1932, §§ 10225, 10227; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 202; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-709; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 47, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Former §§ 30-602 and 30-603, referred to in (6), have been amended and renumbered as §§ 30-2-402 and 30-2-403.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote (a)(1)(G) which read: “The appointment and removal of guardians for minors and persons of unsound mind, and all controversies as to the right of guardianship, and the settlement of guardian accounts;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 110. July 1, 2011.

Cross-References. Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 39, 44, 317, 323, 535, 554, 601, 602.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 30; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 7, 54, 66; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 24; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 7; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 45.

Law Reviews.

Decedent's Estates: The Rights of Adopted Persons Under Tennessee's Descent and Distribution and Adoption Statutes to Take by Intestate Succession or by Will or Trust, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (1992).

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Attorney General Opinions. General sessions court of Jackson County. OAG 10-80, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (6/3/10).

16-16-108. Distribution, partition, and sale of realty.

The county court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the chancery and circuit courts to sell real estate of decedents and for distribution or partition. The mode of procedure in those cases in the county courts shall conform in every respect to the rules and regulations laid down for the conduct of similar causes in the chancery and circuit courts.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1873, ch. 64, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 6028; Code 1932, § 10226; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-710; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Transfer of probate jurisdiction to chancery court, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 30; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 54.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Cited: Dick v. Dick, 223 Tenn. 228, 443 S.W.2d 472, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 407 (1969); In re Estate of Ardell Hamilton Trigg, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 53 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 9, 2011).

16-16-109. Powers necessary to jurisdiction.

The county court is expressly vested, over all subjects enumerated in §§ 16-16-107 and 16-16-108, with all the power and authority necessary and proper to the exercise of the jurisdiction conferred.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4203; Shan., § 6030; Code 1932, § 10228; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-711; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Transfer of probate jurisdiction to chancery court, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 317.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461.

Cited: Davis v. Williams, 158 Tenn. 34, 12 S.W.2d 532, 1928 Tenn. LEXIS 121 (1928); Brewer v. Griggs, 10 Tenn. App. 378, — S.W.2d —, 1929 Tenn. App. LEXIS 46 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1929); Browne v. Browne, 547 S.W.2d 239, 1977 Tenn. LEXIS 553 (Tenn. 1977); In re Estate of Ardell Hamilton Trigg, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 53 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 9, 2011).

16-16-110. Powers in sale of property.

The court may, pursuant to § 16-16-109, appoint commissioners to make sale of real or personal property, taking bond and security for the faithful performance of duty, when deemed necessary; may revise, set aside, or confirm the proceedings of the commissioners, as such other courts; render judgments or decrees upon notes and obligations taken in the progress of a cause, and relieve, upon petition, any purchaser or party, or person interested, by opening biddings, setting aside sales, or otherwise, like the circuit or chancery court in similar cases.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4205 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 185, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 6032; Code 1932, § 10230; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-712; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Transfer of probate jurisdiction to chancery court, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 21; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 37; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 7.

Cited: Brewer v. Griggs, 10 Tenn. App. 378, — S.W.2d —, 1929 Tenn. App. LEXIS 46 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1929).

Collateral References. Judicial Sales
1-3, 22.

16-16-111. Powers after confirmation of sale.

When land is sold by any order or decree of the county court, and the sale reported by the clerk and confirmed by the court, the county court shall have the same power and jurisdiction over the cause against the purchaser as the chancery court has by law, notwithstanding the sale has been reported and confirmed.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1873, ch. 88, § 2; Shan., § 6034; Code 1932, § 10231; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-713; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Transfer of probate jurisdiction to chancery court, §§ 16-16-201, 16-16-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 21.